 He added, quote, I have a four-month-old diabetic mouse that is now cured.
 Dr Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax,
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the treatment of type one diabetes, and he points out that these results are not relevant to type one diabetes.
 The Nobel Prize in literature was awarded to Bob Dylan on Monday,
 And so we're not doing anything at the moment . We've just sent an Email to his closest collaborator,
 Jamie Siminoff, the company's Ceo,
 He made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff says that after the Shark Tank episode,
 At the end of 2017, Simonyan appeared on the shopping TV channel,
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with another security company, ADT.
 One experimental vaccine seems to have reduced the death rate from Ebola, but so far, no drug has been clearly proven to treat an existing infection.
 ZMapp, the antibody cocktail, was seen as promising at first, but official studies have found it to be less effective than hoped.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a benchmark and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The U S . gymnastics Association, quote, supports the U S . Olympic Committee's letter and acknowledges the absolute need for U S . Olympic officials to help keep our U S . athletes safe.
 We agree with the U S . Olympic Committee that meaningful change within the organization is better than a split.
 The U S . gymnastics board has said it supports an independent investigation to make sure this never happens again.
 The U S . Olympic Committee and the U S . gymnastics team have the same goal,
 Throughout the nineteen sixty s, Brezinski worked for the Kennedy and Lyndon Johnson administrations.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy, and he was the National security advisor to President Henry Kissinger from one thousand nine hundred and seventy seven to one thousand nine hundred and eighty.
 He was the President's chief of staff during the late seventy s,
 Ryan Gosling and Emma stone starring in this film,
 Ryan Gosling and Emma stone were both nominated for best actor and best actress.
 And the other is that it's not a nurturing, caring, and educational experience for the other kids.
 The two songs from that film, the dreamers and the city of stars,
 And the President, Donald Trump, announced through a spokesperson on Sunday that the U S . military would be pulling out of Syria.
 This announcement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey has also said it will protect the captured ISIS fighter who was arrested by European countries.
 This would confirm, at least, that some dinosaurs did have feathers,
 And the top of the feathers were green and the bottom was a little bit more yellow or a little bit more of a greenish color.
 And that discovery also gives us insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 And the feathers were not as well developed as the well-known feathers that we see in birds today.
 The feathers suggest that they were not used for flight, but for temperature regulation or display.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the sample shows that it is not the juvenile's downy feathers,
 And the police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, where a car bomb exploded yesterday morning,
 The governor said nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police say they are investigating the attack as a possible terrorist attack.
 They found that the sun operates in the same way as the other stars,
 And they use it in conjunction with rotation to determine the star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less the star is active in terms of its magnetic field.
 And on one occasion, he was nearly killed by a bear.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog, almost kidnapped in Nepal, and arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 If the base station has a dual radio, then this will allow the old 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g to also work.
 And the theoretical maximum speed is about six hundred Mbps,
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 When asked about the meeting, Miller said, quote, I was prepared to hear what he had to say,
 Xi said, quote, we will strive to bring the per capita unit of carbon dioxide emissions down from the 2005 level
 He did not give a figure, but said the size of the economy would be based on China's economic output.
 And he encouraged developing countries to move away from the old way of just dumping and cleaning up later.
 And he said that the United States should not ask for more than it was capable of doing.
 The Iraq study group released its report at twelve zero GMT.
 At this point, it is not clear whether Iraq's actions will prevent the increase of sectarian violence or chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open discussion and a call for consensus.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the current U S . policy in Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 First, one of the 78 recommendations is that we should have a new foreign policy in place by the end of this year,
 The current Argentinian President, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner,
 In two thousand and five, Kirchner began her Presidential campaign at the same place, the Argentine theatre.
 After Katrina, spending on relief and reconstruction was called Bush's New Orleans deal,
 Liberal critics of the rebuilding effort focused on the fact that the rebuilding contracts went to people in Washington.
 Over four hundred thousand people came to Rome for the funeral.
 The number of people was so great that most of them couldn't get into the funeral procession that was held in St . Peter's square.
 There were also large television screens set up in various places around Rome so that people could watch the funeral.
 In many other cities, including Rome, Italy and other cities around the world,
 Historians have criticized the FBI for focusing on easy cases like the stolen car incident,
 The U S . Congress allocated funding for the effort starting in two thousand and five, and the FBI was directed to put at least ten agents in the adult pornography field.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings highest score of 70 runs in just 41 balls.
 In the middle order, Khansa batsman Lahiru Thirimanne and Kusal Perera,
 But after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings with only three sixes.
 George W . Bush, the President of the United States,
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng,
 Bush, in the wake of his defeat in the Midterms,
 Mr . Harper, after a twenty five minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton,
 Layton said in a press conference that day, quote, I have asked the prime minister to reconsider the environmental legislation.
 The Federal Government has been accused of using the money to buy votes in the upcoming Federal election,
 But the prime minister, John Howard, said the move was to prevent the state government from cutting hospital funding by four and a half million dollars.
 And the tsunami hit the coast of Niagara and Niagara falls,
 In Tonga, there were no major damage or injuries reported, but the power supply was temporarily cut off, and the Tonga government says it didn't receive a tsunami warning from PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in and around the coastal area were closed Wednesday,
 George W . Bush, the U S . President, welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johnston, a spokesman for Bush,
 The tenth hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season,
 The National Hurricane center says that Hurricane Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that the rainfall would break the levees,
 In the Ninth Ward, the floodwaters from Hurricane Katrina are still rising,
 Beyond the 100-foot levee,
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion in a phone call with Wikinews last month.
 And he said, first of all, he lied to us from the very beginning,
 Recently, in response to a recent outbreak of community backlash,
 But although it relies on a lot of theory, the program is designed to simulate the observation of the Whirlpool Galaxy.
 The effect that the team was looking for could have been caused by the gravitational pull of dark matter between the Galaxy and the dark matter.
 The moon pulls on the earth, and the earth pulls on the moon,
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as it does ordinary matter.
 And according to this theory, most of the dark matter around the Galaxy is actually made up of these tiny little particles.
 The TV footage showed a white cloud of smoke coming from the factory.
 The local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors,
 According to Japanese governmental sources,
 The agency says this indicates that a container holding uranium fuel is leaking.
 Dr Tony Mole found XDR-TB in the KwaZulu-Natal region.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is very difficult to deal with,
 Moll believes that some of the patients could have been infected at the hospital,
 Over a year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 other people.
 But the overall proportion of XDR-TB is not that high . So at any given time,
 Weighing over one thousand pounds and traveling at about seventeen thousand five hundred miles an hour,
 And the scientists say the impact was huge.
 They're still working out the size of the impact and how the earth will be affected.
 The Pentagon's strategic command is tracking the debris.
 The results will be published on a public Website.
 The mother of a Pittsburgh doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh was found dead in the doctor's trunk,
 At the age of twenty nine, Dr . Malathi V . Balasubramaniyam was found naked and unconscious,
 She pointed to her all-black Intro-Gram, which was 150 meters away.
 There, they found the body of a 53-year-old woman, Saroja Balasubramanian,
 The police say the body was there for about a day.
 The first case of the season was reported at the end of July.
 The virus is then transmitted to humans through mosquitoes.
 The Indian government has sent pig hunters to the affected area, distributed thousands of mosquito nets,
 The government has promised to deliver hundreds of millions of the vaccine,
 This year, the most hit region has been delayed in receiving the vaccine due to a lack of funds and other diseases with a lower priority.
 Sven-Harry moved to Sweden three years later, and three years after that, he started working at the Swedish post office,
 He has created over one thousand stamps for Sweden and twenty eight other countries.
 And he's become a legendary figure, known for his high quality and his work is so highly sought after that people will collect only his work.
 His 1,000th stamp, a monumental work by David Klutz, was a portrait of the Kings of Sweden,
 He has also been involved in the design of other countries' banknotes, including the new five and one hundred dollars Canadian banknotes.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to the hospital,
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the collision.
 The same day, at around twelve zero hours,
 One worker at a nearby repair shop said,
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics include saving the world's forests and helping developing countries to grow in ways that are less polluting.
 The UN also hopes to help fund the efforts of countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go to flood resilience, water management,
 Fluke wrote that women were just trying to push their agenda,
 She urged that the pill should be regarded as a medical necessity by both men and women,
 As the injured were being taken to the hospital, the inmates, about forty of them,
 Negotiators tried to fix the situation, but the prisoners' demands were unclear.
 Between one and two o'clock MDT,
 Soon, riot control police, equipped with riot control gear, entered the yard and used tear gas to push the inmates into a corner.
 The firefighters finally put out the fire at one point,
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal flooding that used to occur throughout the river stopped.
 This sediment is essential to the formation of sand dunes and beaches that are used for wildlife habitat.
 As a result, two species of fish were wiped out, and two others, including the Humpback Whale, are now endangered.
 The flood will rise a few feet, but officials are hoping that the eroded sand will be replaced.
 The tsunami warning was not issued, and the Jakarta Geophysics Institute said that a tsunami warning would not be issued for a quake of less than a six point five.
 Despite the lack of tsunami warnings, residents began to panic and evacuate their businesses and homes.
 Although Winifred was in tears at the farewell, she promised the fans that she would definitely come back.
 And I'm Krista Tippett . stay with us
 According to the final results of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections,
 The ruling party, the South West Africa people's Organisation, SWAPO,
 The allies and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it,
 The collision occurred at a high elevation and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 Medical aid agencies, the Red Cross, and the World Health Organization say this is the worst outbreak the country has ever seen.
 And the West found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 The weather was good, with a morning shower that soon passed, and the day was perfect for the seven nations Rugby.
 South Africa, the top seed,
 In the South American games, South Africa was completely out of their depth,
 Well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and a great teamwork made it obvious to everyone that the team would win.
 The city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with a fungus and is in danger of falling, which poses a public health risk.
 It was scheduled to be torn down on Tuesday,
 And the name of the seven sisters is given to all the caves that have a diameter of at least one hundred and twenty eight feet.
 The infrared photos show the temperature change between day and night,
 They are cooler in the day and warmer at night.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most interesting things in the area for kids.
 In France, voting is a traditionally low-level experience . voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed ballot in an envelope.
 The staff will then verify the voter's identity,
 The French election law, on the other hand,
 And from that point on, the ballot box was made to be transparent so that voters and supervisors could see that no other ballot was put inside.
 The candidate can send a representative to oversee the whole process,
 The Eee PC was unveiled at the Taipei IT month in 2007.
 But Asus won the Taiwanese government's Ah Sustainable Development Award in two thousand and seven,
 The station's Website describes the show as, quote, a fresh, bold, and unorthodox radio theater.
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet radio,
 By the end of 2015, TogiNet had established a subsidiary broadcasting station called AstroNet Radio.
 The show originally featured local amateurs from the East Texas area.
 The law enforcement officials did not show up in Bishkek,
 One witness described the scene as people were roaming the streets and looting the shops,
 Some residents of the South protested against the lawlessness of the South's protesters.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match against all blacks,
 The final score was a one point win for the All Blacks,
 The Spurs won five straight games.
 Two weeks earlier, the team had won the All-Blacks' final.
 The final game of the series is in Johannesburg at Ellis Park next week.
 Monday at ten forty eight P M . Eastern time,
 The us Geological survey and the National earthquake information center said there were no immediate reports of damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was about twenty kilometers to the northeast of Dylan,
 A deadly bird flu variant, H5N1, has been found in a dead wild duck in a marsh near Lyon, in the east of France.
 France is the seventh country in Europe to be hit by the virus.
 In Croatia and Denmark, the cases are still unconfirmed.
 Chamberlain has widely been quoted as saying, quote,
 And Chambers, who was a notorious atheist,
 And he said, quote, I think the story of Camille Saint-Saens is a story of a man who was dominated by drugs and by his love of Japan.
 And as a result, performers on stage are encouraged to smoke marijuana and cigarettes in front of the audience.
 Newt Gingrich, Rick Perry, and Michelle Bachman,
 Gingrich, however, was not impressed and he called Romney a coward for running negative ads against Gingrich.
 Percy was the first to leave the meeting, and he went back to Texas to decide if he would stay in the race or not.
 Bachmann ended her campaign in August.
 The photographer was taken to Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center,
 In a statement, he said, quote, I was not at the scene of this tragic event,
 The photographer was seen putting the car on the other side of the street,
 The police say that the driver of the car that hit the photographer is unlikely to be charged.
 Because only eighteen medals are given out per day,
 Yesterday, in the women's standing class,
 Michelle Goli was in the men's standing super G,
 In the men's super-heavyweight category, Ali Belaes was 15th, and New Zealand's Adam Hol was 9th.
 And the Polish skiers Maciej Krezel and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, finished in 13th place in the men's Super-G.
 Since the 2010 earthquake, the UN peacekeepers stationed in Haiti have been under fire for the spread of disease near their base camp.
 The UN camp allegedly did not properly disinfect the wastewater that was discharged into the Artibonite River,
 Before the Army came in, Haiti had not had a problem with disease since the eighteen hundred s.
 The Haiti Institute for justice and democracy,
 The U N . disease expert, Daniel Lantrua, says this rapid increase was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton says the Howard University hospital confirmed that he was in stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria,
 The hospital has followed infection control guidelines, including separating patients from other people.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked in a variety of different jobs.
 In the eighty s, he worked on shows like taxi, cheers, and the Cosby show.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet radio as a subsidiary station.
 He left the show in two thousand and three, but he's kept the title of executive producer and has continued to get paid millions of dollars each year.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the plane was then diverted to Kandahar,
 According to the initial reports, the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after it was refused permission to land in Uzbekistan.
 Iran has a large and aging fleet of both civilian and military aircraft,
 The international sanctions meant that the new aircraft could not be bought.
 Up means you should start at the tip and push the bow, and down means you should start at the frog and pull the bow.
 Last month, a plane crash in Iran killed 168 people,
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed off the runway at Masjid-Ul-Arab airport,
 Air Force one canceled the remaining concerts.
 The tour was scheduled to run through the United States and Canada until September sixteenth.
 Lead vocalist Steven Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August five,
 Murray won the first set, and then broke serve to take the second.
 Delport was first to bat in the second innings, but Delport was out for six,
 Fortunately, he was able to return to the game,
 This program is produced by the Australian Broadcasting Corporation.
 Famous singers from all over the country sang the religious hymn,
 And then, the evening's entertainment began with the evening's opening act,
 And Lakshmi, in turn, sang about the birds.
 And the Spaniards started the colonization period which lasted for three centuries.
 Lata Mangeshkar also performed in the film,
 And on Thursday, at the opening of the Tokyo game show, Nintendo's Iwata Satoru,
 Similar to a television remote, the Controller uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 And this allows players to control the device in the air,
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car early on,
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had to retire after a right front wheel puncture.
 Michelin found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 According to the tape, he said, quote, she's very cute and she sings pretty well.
 I'm Krista Tippett, and this is on being
 About three minutes after launch, a very large amount of insulation foam was seen to fall off the external tank.
 But these are not thought to have caused the damage to the shuttle.
 And the standard equipment will allow good viewing . and the standard equipment will allow good viewing.
 The winds were blowing at about fifty miles per hour for about a minute, and then it started to rain, and it was like needles were hitting people.
 And the vast majority of them are in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 NHK also reported that the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. says the quake had no impact on its Shika nuclear power plant,
 The 9,400 households in the area are said to live without water, and around 100 households are said to live without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and railroad service was suspended in the affected areas,
 A bomb went off outside the governor's house.
 Two more bombs went off two hours later near the government building.
 Officially, the death toll is eight, but some reports say the death toll is as high as thirty.
 And the animals that ate the contaminated food died of kidney failure.
 The two compounds react with each other to form a crystal, which the researchers say can block the function of the kidney.
 The researchers found that the addition of Melanin and Siamin resulted in the formation of crystals in the cat's urine.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the crystals found in the urine of the affected animals.
 As you may or may not know, most of the goods that come into this country are duty free.
 Although eighty percent of our goods are taxed through customs in the central American countries,
 That's not fair . that's not fair.
 I'm going to say it again, the way we treat you, you treat us.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, signed a bill into law that bans the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The law also requires that violent Video games sold in California be labeled with a rating of eighteen and that anyone selling these games to minors be fined one thousand dollars.
 The Attorney General, Keir Starmer, and the chief prosecutor, Brendan Pryce,
 Hume was replaced by Ed Davey, a former business Secretary of state,
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear in Westminster magistrates' court on February sixteen.
 The two dead were Nicholas Olson, age twenty five, and Zachary Cuddback, age twenty one.
 Edgar Veguilla was shot in the arm and neck, and Kristoffer Schneider was shot in the face,
 Uka's weapon missed its fifth target, and Schneider was left with a permanent eye injury, a missing part of his skull, and a titanium faceplate.
 Schneider testified via Video link from his home at the us Air Force base.
 Carpano also competed in two individual races at the championships,
 Her first run, a downhill,
 And she finished in tenth place in the women's giant slalom with a total time of four minutes, forty one point six zero,
 The four women skiers who had been seated in the women's section did not make it to the finish line,
 Madia Pradeep Singh,
 And the police have arrested five men for the alleged rape of a Swiss woman,
 The suspects are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrakirti Solanki, the police chief,
 Three people were in the car, but no one was hurt.
 But the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road was temporarily closed, and the ambulance crew rescued the driver from the red Audi TT.
 At first he was in the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is on trial in Edinburgh, Scotland, for the murder of his son.
 She is in custody, awaiting trial, but her reputation is so widespread that her testimony may be Biased.
 This is a common practice in England, but the Scottish law is different, and the court found the photo publishing to be a potential harm.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee says,
 The crown office, which is in charge of the overall prosecution, has told reporters it will say no more until the trial is over.
 According to the leaked document, the 1967 war was based on the pretext of a border dispute between Israel and Palestine.
 Reports have indicated that the two countries have agreed to discuss the future of Jerusalem and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel, on the other hand, insisted that the current troops be allowed to stay for ten years, while the PA agreed that they would leave after five.
 Participants in the trial were supposed to be supervised by a forestry officer.
 NPWS and the Australian sports shooters Association partnered to run a sports shooters Association's hunting program,
 NPWS's Park Conservation and Heritage officer, Mike Opalinski, says the first four shooters who were selected for the first shoot were all given comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday in front of a nine-member provisional electoral council.
 This is the fifth time that Matel has done a CEP in five years.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended that the old CEP resign as part of a new election preparation.
 The Commission was set up in response to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October.
 The statement said, quote, some violent resistance was sparked by the fact that several elections were not held from 2011.
 About sixty cases of iPod overheating were reported, and six total fires were reported,
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry acknowledged that it had been aware of 27 incidents related to the device.
 Last week, the Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 And the reason for that is that Japan is often referred to, on a geographical stance, as an archipelago.
 The earthquake hit the Mariana Islands at seven zero P M . local time,
 The North Mariana Island disaster management agency said no damage was reported nationwide.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer has hijacked a bus in the Philippines' capital, Manila, and taken tourists from Hong Kong as hostages.
 Rolando Mendoza shot and killed two tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six were confirmed dead.
 The six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early on, along with the Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an old woman had to go to the bathroom, the photographers took her place.
 And he followed in his father's footsteps into the medical field.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and worked at the Auckland women's hospital from 1959.
 Working in a hospital, Dong-Han Liu began to research early labor.
 His research showed that when you give a pregnant woman a hormone,
 Xinhua news agency reported that government investigators had recovered two of the plane's black boxes on Wednesday.
 Other fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 And Tammy Duffner is our first and only female director of the show.
 And the person who was waiting to cross the road said, quote, Unquote,
 In the lead up to the 2010 Federal election, a poll of 1,400 people found that opposition to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by eight percent since two thousand and eight.
 Julia Gillard, the prime minister, during the 2010 Federal election campaign,
 In a recent poll, thirty four percent said they would prefer Elizabeth the second to be the last monarch.
 And through a public opinion poll, twenty nine percent of the respondents thought that Australia should become a Republic,
 The Olympic gold medalist was expected to compete in the one hundred and two hundred meter freestyle,
 Medications that are needed to overcome the pain were banned from the games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at the University of central Missouri,
 Several people had used various hardware and software to confirm the finding by the end of February,
 Comets may have been the source of water that helped make up the building blocks of life on earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets are formed, especially how the earth was formed,
 Cuomo, who is 53, took office at the beginning of this year, and last month signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called it a political gossip and a foolishness.
 He is expected to run for President in the 2016 Presidential election.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA says will allow planes to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 This is in contrast to the old ground-based technology, which relied on ground-based radar,
 In Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface trains stopping,
 Concerns about the lack of public transportation have led to the possibility of holding the game without spectators.
 A study published in the Journal science last Thursday announced a new species of bird has been formed in the Galapagos Islands off Ecuador.
 And the researchers found that in just two generations, the new species had evolved from a local bird, the Darwin finch,
 Gold can be shaped in all sorts of shapes, even in very small shapes.
 It can be rolled or folded, it can be beaten or rolled with a hammer,
 And it could be made very thin and could be attached to other metals.
 And the pH of the solution is called the pH of the vegetable juice that you're using to make the indicator.
 Cucumber juice changes color depending on how much of a chemical it has.
 The pH level is expressed as the amount of Hydrogen ions,
 The hydrogen ion is a positively charged ion,
 They did two experiments marking either the DNA in the phage with a radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the phage with radioactive sulfur.
 The water in the outer layer reacts with the outer layer and forms a kind of a skin.
 Cities like Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had elaborate sewage systems connected to almost every home.
 Houses in Santorini and Crete, the Minoan city of Knossos,
 Toilets were also found in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China,
 If you're talking to someone a few thousand kilometers away,
 The satellite receives the signal, and then it almost immediately sends it back.
 The satellite is launched into space by a rocket.
 To put a satellite or telescope in space, you need a rocket that's more than one hundred feet long.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the most important of which is that it has made travel much easier and faster.
 It has brought trains, cars, and many other modes of transportation.
 Below that are medium-sized animals like rabbits, hares, and deer, which are hunted by medium-sized animals like wolves and bears.
 And finally, there are a whole lot more small,
 The key to their success is a concept called niche,
 Lions are the most social of all the big cats,
 The herd consists of one to three adult males, and as many as thirty or forty females and young.
 A female is more likely to be raised in a large family,
 And it's not uncommon for a lion to act like a lion, a tiger, or a wolf,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete, and although it is not as good as a human, it can climb high, swim, and jump five times as far as a human.
 Tigers, lions, tigers, and lions are the only four animals that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not like the roar of the lion, but it is like the roar of a word that is being shouted.
 Ocelot prefers to hunt small animals, preferably those that are much smaller than he is,
 And scientists think that Ocelots use scent to track and find their prey.
 The Ocellated lizard can see in the dark, and it can move very, very carefully,
 And so they are continually establishing new routes amongst the endless potential of walls.
 In these new environments, new resources and new competitors exist, and so new species need to have different traits or adaptations than before.
 The original population has not changed at all, but the adaptation is still necessary.
 As time went on and new people started to adapt to the new environment,
 And in the end, after thousands or even millions of years,
 We call this a speciation, and it's a new species that's formed.
 Plants make the oxygen we breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide we exhale.
 Plants use the sunlight for Photosynthesis,
 We build our houses with trees and we make our clothes with plants . Most of the food we eat is vegetable . Without plants, animals would not survive.
 The age where the events took place is commonly referred as the High Middle Ages the period of European history in the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 The skull was full of more than seventy very sharp teeth, and these teeth were in addition to the jaw teeth.
 It is not clear whether it had a beak, but it may have, and it probably ate turtles, large fish, and other mosasaurs,
 And this animal would attack anything that came into the water, even a giant dinosaur like Tyrannosaurus.
 Their food was mostly familiar to us, but the Roman's banqueting fare included some unusual and strange things like wild boar,
 And the other difference is that poor people and women sat on chairs, while the rich men sat on the floor,
 The ancient Romans could not have eaten foods that were centuries old,
 They had no access to corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cocoa,
 The Babylonians built a temple to the main God they believed in,
 People would bring offerings to the gods, and priests would try to meet the gods' demands through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary,
 Sometimes they were called Ziggurats, and sometimes they were called pyramids.
 The very top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, homes were not as important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely outdoors.
 The women were cooking in the yard, the shops were just stalls on the street, and the stones were used to build houses.
 And there were no trees in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Erik the Red, according to the Norse Sagas, was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 But the Eskimo tribes were already living there at that time.
 Each of these countries, though, had its own King, its own customs, and its own history.
 If you've seen the movie National treasure,
 But in reality, it's not true . Even if there's something written on the back, it's not a treasure map.
 The document, according to the leak, will refer to the borders dispute, which the United States wrote,
 Whoever wrote it down, no one knows, but this large parchment document,
 And it's possible that it was just labeled as such.
 D-Day and the subsequent battle liberated northern France, but the South was still not free.
 And the French, who had been collaborating with the Nazis,
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France,
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated the South of France and were turning their sights on Germany.
 And the reason is that the people are working together,
 The word civilization comes from the Latin word civitas, which means city or city state.
 The city-states were the pioneers of civilization, culture, and the transmission, preservation, and fair distribution of knowledge.
 A few cultures have left meaningful historical evidence, but most have not and are not considered to be a proper civilization.
 During the war, the thirteen colonies formed a central government,
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and there was no national executive or judicial branch to enforce the laws.
 And the Congress had no power to repeal the laws of the States or to repeal the tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous consent from all the States, and the central government was ignored by most of the state delegates.
 Italy's national football team has been ranked as the second most successful team in the world, and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 The most popular sports are football, baseball, volleyball, handball, fencing, Rugby, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern part of the country, and sometimes Italian athletes compete in international and Olympic games.
 Japan has almost 7,000 Islands, making it the seventh largest Island country in the world.
 And the reason for that is because of the cluster of Islands that Japan has.
 Taiwan was named by sailors in the fifteenth century as Ilha Formosa, the beautiful Island.
 In the early seventeenth century, the Dutch East India company set up a base in Southwestern Taiwan,
 In sixteen eighty three, the Qing dynasty's Army took over the West and North of Taiwan,
 In the first Sino-Japanese war of eighteen ninety four to eighteen ninety five,
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures,
 Most of the buildings on the edge have been rebuilt to allow tourists to better understand the original look.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored, and restoration work is ongoing to this day.
 For example, the most common still image photo format in the world is 35 mm, which was the most common film size at the end of the analogue film era.
 But it's still being produced today, and the more important point is that it's been carried over into the image sensor format of Digital cameras.
 And it's a little bit confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the ratio of the two is three to two, or three over two.
 Several common formats, such as the APS format,
 The rule of thirds is often derided and often misused,
 The major rule is that the most effective position to position the main subject is the intersection of the lines that divide the image into three parts,
 And at this time, the Catholic Church was being thoroughly investigated.
 For over a thousand years, Christianity has bound European countries together, despite their differences in language and customs.
 The power of it is felt by all, from King to peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that money should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's currency fund exists for just that reason.
 The church's core power had been in Rome for over a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money created a lot of questions about the validity of the church.
 Immediately after the outbreak of war, the United Kingdom began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although this blockade violated international law, which was generally accepted at the time,
 The British Navy had been able to prevent any ship from entering the high seas,
 And the Germans expected a similar response to their unrestricted U-Boat campaign.
 In the nineteen twenty s, the dominant mood in most of the world was pacifism and isolationism.
 Through the first World War, nations that had gone through the horrors of the first World War,
 In eighteen eighty four, he moved to the United States,
 He had a letter of recommendation from his former boss, Charles Batchelor,
 In ancient China, there were different ways of representing each era,
 And there were also many periods of instability between each dynasty,
 During this time, there was a lot of fighting between the nobles who were vying for the throne.
 The three kingdoms period is one of the most bloody periods in ancient Chinese history,
 The absolute Monarchy gave way to a Republic,
 And after the revolution, jobs were open to all men, so the most ambitious and the most successful could succeed.
 Instead, the current system is based on a merit-based system,
 And it also inspired other countries to have their own revolutions.
 And he was always in search of a deeper problem, a deeper question,
 The caves have withstood the ravages of time and the elements to reveal a very clear picture of Muhammad's religious orientation.
 It's located at the top of a mountain in the North of Mecca, and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's hard to find it, because once you're inside the cave,
 Surrounded by a clear and beautiful sky,
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists.
 Built around 2,500 BC by the ancient Egyptians,
 Giza Plateau or Giza Necropolis,
 The great pyramid was built to honor the Pharaoh Khufu, and the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wife and family.
 The V-shaped one is called the upstroke, and the one that has no stem or bottom is called the downstroke.
 The bowstring is the string that is attached to the bow, and the bowstring is the string that is attached to the bowstring.
 The Overtone is usually a softer sound, while the Undertone is a harder, more confident sound.
 You can draw your own mark on it, but the bow mark is for the purpose of the music,
 The King, the queen, and their two children, Marie-Therese and Louis-Charles,
 The King and queen, riding in a chariot, were surrounded by the crowd,
 The crowd forced the King and queen to open the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a member of the Royal guard was seen waving the head of a Royal guard who had been killed in the Palace.
 The United States used the Philippines as a place to dump its war debt,
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial government in order to pay for the Philippines,
 And of course, the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute a basic element in the American imperialist system.
 To understand the Templars, we need to understand the creation of the order.
 The period of time that we're talking about is the middle ages,
 And the Middle Ages, the late Middle Ages, and the early Middle Ages,
 And the idea is that technology is driven by a fundamental logic,
 Most of the interpretations of the term have two main ideas,
 For example, someone might argue that the automobile has driven the development of the road.
 But the national road network is not economically viable for a small number of cars, so a new production method is developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 And as more and more people own vehicles, the number of road accidents increases, which in turn leads to new technologies to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many of the characteristics of a culture that was influenced by Goethe,
 And in the romantic view, time and culture grew out of that geography,
 Paris became the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople the fashion capital of the medieval era.
 The center of luxury and wealth, it began around the year four hundred and lasted until the year eleven hundred.
 The status of Constantinople had fallen, mainly because the Crusaders were bringing back goods that were more valuable than the Byzantine goods,
 And at this time, the fashion capital moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked between the tenth and eleventh centuries,
 In the early days, the dress was heavily influenced by the Byzantine culture of the East.
 But the information exchange was slow, and the Western style could have been 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, Europeans began to develop their own style, and one of the biggest developments was that people started to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 And so, the specialty crop is one that is grown by a specialty crop farmer,
 And it's a system that's very simple and organic,
 Historically, most farmers have practiced subsistence agriculture, and still do in many developing countries.
 A subculture is a group of people who feel alienated from the mainstream culture,
 A Subculture is a group of people who share a common interest,
 And the way in which we distinguish between them is through a combination of linguistic, aesthetic,
 Members of a subculture often identify with a subculture through a unique and symbolic style,
 One of the most common ways of showing this is by using the case of a few unfortunate children who have not been socialized by adults,
 These children are called feral children, and some of them are even kept in cages by their parents,
 Wild children may have experienced severe childhood trauma or trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some children are said to have been reared by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild.
 And they are not like the ancient Romans, who were completely raised by wild animals,
 Project-Based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and Scratching takes it one step further.
 The scaffolding approach is more like a tutor, helping people to use new programs or to start a new project.
 The virtual and the real can both be a form of the same thing, which is to say, the teacher is a form of the little paper clip,
 The virtual structure is built into the software and is designed to help students ask,
 The reasons for a child being placed in foster care range from neglect, abuse,
 All children should be raised in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment,
 We see the trusted protection system as a safe zone for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a loving caregiver,
 The home environment must be able to provide all the essential elements that are not being met in the existing home.
 The Internet has both a collective and an individual communication element.
 The Internet has added a new dimension to the way we use and enjoy the Internet.
 And so the two are linked in a way that is important for us to understand.
 And the way that they were able to do that was through what Aimee and MacArthur call personal engagement and ongoing relationship.
 By using the Video-Recording, we were able to make a few Milliseconds of a face movement,
 And he says that he can detect whether or not a person is lying by looking at their fine facial muscles.
 Oliver Sacks wrote in his book the President's Speeches that people with brain damage can still understand the President's sincerity.
 He even suggests that animals, like dogs,
 And according to research in the twentieth century, there are two hidden or apparent genetic Variants.
 Mutations create new genes, and selection removes the expressed genes from the population.
 Separation and Recombination mix up the variations that have occurred in each generation,
 In the savannah, however, the primates that have similar digestive systems to ours have a hard time getting the amino acids they need from the available plant resources.
 And the failure of this system leads to growth retardation, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest to access are the leaves or the proteins from legumes, but these are hard for us, the great Apes, to Digest.
 In contrast, ants, termites, and egg foods, such as mealworms,
 But it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the protein problem in a way that's not so different from how chimpanzees do it today.
 And the normal sleep period is the time when you're intentionally waking up and then you're falling asleep again.
 This is to help you to wake up without fully waking up and to use a relatively quiet alarm clock.
 If you turn off the alarm clock while you're asleep,
 Other biological rhythm-based options include drinking a large amount of water, especially water or a diuretic,
 The amount of patience that a person has is related to the amount of anxiety that is embedded in his or her body and mind.
 The more you relax, the more positive energy will be created in your life, and everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and contentment.
 And the only obstacle to enlightenment is the fear and the negative mindset that we have within ourselves.
 Tibetan Buddhism, however, is based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple it consists of Kundalini,
 Doing Kundalini yoga involves yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantra, and visualization to awaken the Kundalini energy.
 At the center of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse the energy channels, activate the chakras,
 In the second World War, Germany was a common enemy, and this led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States.
 Two years later, the war was over, and the old allies had become the new enemies.
 The cold war would continue for the next forty years and would be fought in other places, such as in Africa, in Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba,
 On September seventeenth, nineteen thirty nine, the Polish defense was already in ruins,
 But these plans were rendered useless when over eighty thousand Soviet Army soldiers invaded Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts,
 And the use of ships to transport goods across the ocean is the most efficient way to move large quantities of goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission has traditionally been to transport people and goods,
 One of the most notable recent examples was the North Atlantic campaign of the second World War,
 At the same time, the German Navy, which relied heavily on U-Boats,
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have conquered Britain,
 Goat and sheep raising began about one hundred thousand years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 And the ancient cultures and tribes started to keep them,
 And the goats are usually herded in a flock, usually by a shepherd,
 The first motorway in the United Kingdom was built in the early sixteenth century.
 And the roads were just made of parallel wooden planks, but they were still a little bit more efficient than the roads of the past.
 To fix the rails, the timber was used quite early on, but it was found that the rails were more efficient when they were on top of the iron rails.
 This became a common practice, but iron tended to wear out the wooden wheels of the chariot.
 And as time went on, the wooden wheel was replaced by the iron wheel,
 The first known transportation to mankind was walking, and two million years ago, Homo Erectus came along,
 Their ancestor, Australopithecus,
 But the earliest known example of bipedalism is well represented in the Australopithecus,
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life,
 In many cases, this is similar to symptomatic treatment, but in order to not stop at a temporary solution,
 And the world has changed a lot since then, and it's become much more obvious that the world is overpopulated and that our lifestyle is too wasteful.
 On the fourth of July, the Congress adopted it, and then, on the fifth, John Hancock and Charles Thomson,
 During that night, fifteen hundred to two thousand copies were made.
 On July eight, the document was first read aloud by John Nixon in the front yard of the independence hall.
 One was sent to George Washington on July sixth, and he read it to his troops in New York on July ninth.
 The remaining twenty five Dhurms are still known to exist, although the handwritten originals are no longer extant.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still with us today,
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make dinosaurs look like birds.
 They have feet with webbed toes, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like T . rex.
 Most of the computers that we use today use a Binary system to manipulate information.
 A Binary number can have only two values, zero or one, and these numbers are called Binary or bits.
 Intoxication can be difficult to diagnose, as symptoms may not appear immediately,
 The most obvious sign of a misreading is a medicine or a toxic household chemical that's been left open.
 For specifics on how to treat a specific poison,
 The term bug is actually a term that entomologists use to refer to these kinds of insects.
 The term is derived from the old English word for a parasite, which is a bug that lives on another creature.
 The Crab-Eating and the Vine-Snagging are both chronic insects,
 The most common neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults is multiple sclerosis,
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system,
 Women are two and a half times more likely to get multiple sclerosis than men,
 The couple may decide that it is not in the best interests of the child or the parents to raise the child.
 These couples may choose to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their parental rights.
 The main objective of science is to understand how the world works through a scientific method.
 But the experiment is to remove one or more of those hypotheses and to lead to a new question,
 A scholar of theology and philosophy,
 And in science, Aristotle's view of all matter was accepted.
 And as the knowledge of Greek declined, so did the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 And many of the rhythms that we observe in our physiology and behaviour are dependent on the existence of an internal clock.
 Bacteria, fungi, plants and most living organisms are not simply responding to an external periodic signal,
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining clock that can keep on ticking even when there are no external cues.
 Hershey and Chase's experiment was one of the leading studies that suggested DNA was a genetic material.
 Hersh and Chase used Phage or a virus to insert the DNA.
 When they were in the presence of radioactive gold or radioactive protein,
 Mutations can have a variety of effects depending on the type of the Mutation,
 Mutations in only one of the two parental cells can result in a child with a genetic disorder,
 Tourism based on nature includes the scenery of plants and animals, including wildlife,
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo, a photo, a lesson,
 Every day, people leave the small town to go to work in the city,
 This dynamic transportation shuttle will connect and support a transportation system that is based on the automobile.
 And now, scientific data show that this massive,
 Everyone participates in the transportation system,
 In the developed world, there are few complaints about the quality of the roads,
 Why does the transportation system keep generating these complaints, and why does it keep underperforming?
 And the traffic flow is the study of how individual drivers and vehicles interact with each other.
 Unfortunately, it's not possible to predict the driver's behavior 100% of the time.
 Luckily, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range,
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three main characteristics were set up,
 These relationships help with the planning, design, and operation of roadways.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly in the air, and their ability to fly helped them to escape enemies and find food more efficiently.
 Most insects, however, have the advantage of being able to fold their wings backward.
 This gives them a wider range of smaller places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the moth and the butterfly.
 And he was the first to suggest that the planets revolve around the sun.
 A few people, including Hale, believed that the sun, including the earth,
 It's like the earth is not moving, it's like it's not moving,
 The Amazon is the second longest river in the world,
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, and at times it is as wide as six miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the earth's rivers into the ocean comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is the largest in the world, and it is so long that it takes three thousand miles to go from one end to the other.
 And the last of the great pyramids was built right up to the end of the old Kingdom,
 The ancient Egyptians were amazed at the ancient Egyptians' monumental buildings,
 The Vatican city state has a population of about eight hundred people,
 The Vatican city state uses Italian for its legislation and official communications.
 And Italian is also a daily language, unlike Latin, which is a dead language,
 All citizens of the Vatican city are Roman Catholics.
 People have known about basic chemicals like gold, silver, copper, and iron,
 Aristotle thought that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements,
 And Aristotle was the first to suggest that these four States of matter,
 An alloy is basically two or more metals mixed together . don't forget that there are a lot of metals on the periodic table.
 And so we have a metaphor for exotic, distant lands,
 And it also contains some alloys, which contain a little bit of Non-Metal,
 Everything in the universe is made up of tiny little particles called atoms.
 And the atom is so small that it can fit a few trillion of them in the period at the end of this sentence.
 And so the pencil has become a very useful tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, a new writing style came along and made the pencil less important.
 Now people don't need to write messages on the computer screen or even use a pencil anymore.
 And people are wondering what will happen to the keyboard if something new is created.
 A nuclear fission bomb requires a large amount of energy to combine the nuclei.
 It's like pulling a heavy wagon up a hill . When you split the atom again, some of that energy is released.
 Some of them have unstable nuclei, which means that they have a tendency to split on their own,
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km thick on the far side.
 The crust is about seventy kilometers thick on the near side, and about one hundred kilometers thick on the far side.
 Crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 Because the crust is thinner, it is more likely that the magma will rise closer to the surface.
 Theories are focused on what causes people to do certain things or to be driven to do certain things.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs or needs that are internalized by the time they are adults.
 These theories are about the specific people who are around you and the environment that you're in and how they affect what you do and don't do.
 The two most popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 And the two most common ways that managers start to do this are,
 And these types of managers are not well received by people, and they have a hard time holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, you have the person who thinks that everything they've been doing is wrong and that they need to change it all and become a different person.
 And the leader is ultimately responsible for the team's success or failure.
 This kind of behavior creates chaos between the leader and the members.
 A virtual team, on the other hand, has the same standards of excellence as a traditional team,
 And the virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real team members.
 They are able to understand the changing time zones better than the local management team,
 And the early reports say the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in rmqi.
 And the invisible team is a management team that each member reports to.
 Why does it take so long for an organization to move from a learning concept to an execution?
 When all the resources available to an organization are used efficiently,
 And as a result, the process of overcoming the obstacle together
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create not only a culture of innovation,
 Angel, in two thousand and six, wrote a book called the continuum,
 Neurobiological data provides the empirical evidence that is necessary to narrow down the field of research.
 The links between brain and behaviour are helping to inform the work of scientists.
 There are many different types of brain injury, trauma, tumor,
 The advent of new technology has allowed us to see and study the brain in ways that were not possible before.
 This gives us a lot of information and data to help us create a simulation model.
 AI is a term that's often used in science fiction, but it's a very important field in computer science,
 AI research includes research that automates tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 For example, writing, voice, face recognition, of course, control, planning, scheduling, and customer diagnostics and answering questions.
 These things have become a separate discipline that focuses on solving problems that arise in everyday life.
 AI systems are now being used in many different areas, such as the economy, health care, engineering, and the military.
 Field trips are a big part of every classroom . typically, a teacher wants to take his or her students to a place where they don't need a bus.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, so students can sit in their classroom and see a museum exhibit,
 Virtual field trips are a great way to look back on field trips and share your experiences with future classes.
 The definition has geographic variations, where the age limit may be shorter in places such as North Carolina,
 Blogging helps students improve their writing skills, and it helps students improve their writing skills, and it helps students improve their writing skills,
 Most of the time, the students are the most critical audience, so the Blog writer tries to improve his writing.
 Blogs also encourage students to be more curious and to seek out information that is interesting and relevant to them.
 Blogging encourages cooperation and encourages students to go beyond the traditional classroom experience.
 And they all responded to the accident scene actively.
 Ottawa is a bilingual, charming capital of Canada, and its many art galleries and museums illuminate both the past and the present of Canada.
 The Niagara falls are in the South, and the Muskoka region is in the North.
 All of these things make Ontario stand out as a true Canadian experience.
 The northern part of the country is very sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited.
 This will surprise a lot of people,
 The Islands of East Africa lie along the East African coast.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique place on earth for wildlife.
 Most of the smaller Islands are either independent or associated with France,
 Islam was also spread through Arabs, and there was a big change in Comoros and Mayotte.
 The influence of Europe and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco Da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 The North is bordered by the Caspian sea, the South and West by the Black Sea.
 The woman is expected to say that she is married,
 And wearing a ring can help you with that . So,
 Women are more likely to be seen as being harassed by a man's touching their arm or hand than by a man's touching their breasts.
 And to not be afraid of being called a cultural bigot,
 Modern-day Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Byzantines.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it, but after the earthquake of 1755, they abandoned it and moved to a new site.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt it as Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish traders called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, you can easily find traditional Moroccan products such as leather goods, pottery,
 Goma is a tourist city located in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, Goma was devastated by the Nyiragongo volcano,
 Goma is a fairly safe place, but if you're visiting Goma from the outside, you need to understand the ongoing conflict situation in North Kivu.
 And it's also the cheapest place in Africa to do a mountain gorilla trek and Nyiragongo volcano climb.
 You can use the motorcycle taxi to go around the city, and the regular price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 And it's a very vivid image of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor town, but it has a reputation and an airport.
 As a result of the desert's influence, in 1990, Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 This is one of the most well-known and well-researched sites in the world,
 The city is more Arabic in its character than any other city in Mali,
 KNP is located in the northeastern part of South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the North,
 The park covers an area of 19,500 square kilometres and is divided into fourteen different zones, each of which supports a different range of wildlife.
 This is one of South Africa's most famous national parks,
 Like all South African national parks, there is an entrance fee and a daily conservation fee.
 You can buy a wild card for a specific park in South Africa or a wild card for South Africa's entire national parks system.
 Hong Kong Island is the place that gives Hong Kong its name and is the place that most tourists go to.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is often compared to a shimmering bar graph,
 To get the best view of Hong Kong, leave Hong Kong Island and head to the Kowloon waterfront.
 Most of the development in Hong Kong is concentrated along the northern coast.
 And here we are at the beginning of the colonial era, which is where we'll start our tour.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest Mangrove belt, extending over 80 km from the Bay of Bengal to the Ganges Delta.
 The forest is also home to the Sundarbans National Park,
 This is not just a simple Mangrove swamp, it's part of the once great jungle that covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans is about three thousand eight hundred and fifty square kilometers in area,
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are about 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area.
 Buses run all day long from the Inter-City bus station,
 The buses are often full, so it's best to buy your ticket a few days in advance.
 In most of the city, a comfortable and sturdy small Japanese-Made bus is in service.
 Shared taxis are Nu 150 for Nu 200 for nearby areas.
 The Oyapock River bridge is a Cable-Stayed bridge that connects the Oyapock River and the city of Oiapoque in French Guiana to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 The two towers are eighty three meters high, and the bridge is three hundred and seventy eight meters long,
 The bridge is 15 meters wide and the construction was finished in August 2011,
 This bridge will be fully operational in September of 2017.
 The Guarani people are the most important indigenous group in the Eastern part of Paraguay,
 The Chaco region was home to a number of other indigenous groups, such as the Mataco, Wich, and Pilcomayo.
 Paraguay, called the giant of the South, was born in the sixteenth century when the Spanish conquerors met the indigenous people.
 And the Spanish people began a three hundred year long period of colonialism.
 Asuncin was founded in 1537 and has retained a strong indigenous character and identity ever since.
 Argentina is known to have the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in the Polo Stadium in Las Canitas,
 You can also watch smaller tournaments and games here at other times of the year.
 For more information on the tournament,
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland pound,
 FIC West store is located right across the street from the only bank on the island.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere, and the British pound is generally accepted everywhere.
 In the United Kingdom, the British pound and the American dollar are accepted, but credit cards are not.
 Before leaving the Falklands, however, you should exchange your Falkland Islands pound for sterling.
 Montevideo is located on the Southern tip of the equator, so when it's winter in the northern hemisphere,
 Monterey is a warm, dry climate,
 And the cold is so intense that it can drop to minus forty degrees Celsius,
 And there's no real difference between the rainy season and the dry season.
 Many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, but wild animals are still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the park authority, it should be at least one hundred yards from a bear or a Wolf and at least twenty five yards from all other wildlife.
 No matter how easy they are to deal with,
 Every year, dozens of visitors get hurt because they don't keep a proper distance . These animals are big, wild, and dangerous . keep a safe distance.
 Additionally, the smell can attract bears or other wildlife, so you should keep your food and cooking area clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, and it's on the island of Upolu, which has a population of just over four hundred thousand.
 Apia was founded in the eighteen fifty s and has been the official capital of Samoa since one thousand nine hundred and fifty nine.
 This port was the scene of a naval standoff in eighteen eighty nine when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 Except for one British cruiser, which was sunk,
 And during the period of the Mau movement, when they were organizing for independence,
 Auckland has two harbours, and the most popular are in three different areas.
 North shore Beach is located on the Pacific ocean, and stretches from North of long Beach to the South of Redondo Beach.
 It's a safe swimming beach and most of the beaches are shaded by Pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki drive is on the Waitemata harbour, which is on the outskirts of Auckland,
 These beaches are usually family beaches, and there are many shops lined up along the coast.
 The main local beer is called number one, which is not a complex but a refreshing and light beer.
 There are many French wines that you should try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are easily overlooked.
 The local water is safe to drink, but you can easily buy bottled water if you're concerned.
 To the Australian, the concept of a short black is espresso, a short cappuccino is creamy,
 The hot chocolate is according to the Belgian standard,
 But these corals are very well protected, and they don't get injured by these things.
 But still, you should listen to the signs and be careful,
 The box Jellyfish is found from October to April,
 Sharks are really not that dangerous to humans, but most sharks are afraid of people and will swim away when they see a human.
 The sea-serpent does not live in the sea, but in the rivers that flow into the North Sea.
 And if you book in advance, it gives you a sense of security that you'll have somewhere to stay when you get to your destination.
 The site also has a special offer for camping,
 Travel agents usually offer a package that includes breakfast, airport pickup,
 And we also have the ability to hold a reservation for a customer if they need more time to make a decision or if they need more time to get other documentation,
 However, if there are any modifications or requests,
 At some festivals, like the music festival, a lot of people decide to camp out there, and most of the attendees think that it's a must to have that experience.
 To be close to the music, you have to get there early.
 Although the concerts on the main stage may end,
 Some of the festivals have a special camping area for families with young children.
 When you cross the North Sea in the winter, it can be quite a horrible noise.
 The St . Petersburg cruise includes time in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from the Visa requirement.
 Casinos generally try to maximize the time and money that their customers spend,
 And they're always making sure that the visitors stay and have a good time by providing them with special food, drinks, and entertainment.
 But in some places, they do serve it for free, but alcohol is not served for free because it blurs your judgment.
 If you are driving over high ground or a mountain road,
 The ice and snow make the roads slick and you can't drive as well as you would on a dry asphalt road.
 When the snowstorms come,
 And the windshield wipers are also a problem because they can get in the way of the driver's vision,
 On the other hand, many countries have roads that are always open,
 The safari is probably the most wonderful tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari is widely used to refer to overland travel in Africa,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, are more likely to approach a car, and can be well observed with standard equipment.
 A lion, a cheetah, and a tiger are sometimes shy, so you can use binoculars to observe them better.
 Bushwalking is a term used for a day or a few days of hiking.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5.
 Tokyo, which hosted the summer Olympics twice,
 If you booked a flight and a hotel before the announcement was made,
 The refund rules are different, but as of March, the end of the year, most of the refund rules have not been extended beyond the end of the year.
 Tickets for most events are between two thousand and thirty thousand yen, with the most expensive tickets costing around seven thousand yen.
 And it is known that early in its life, the large parchment document was rolled up for storage.
 If you don't have an iron or you don't like to iron your socks,
 And don't forget to check out our other videos on how to sew and how to make your own clothes.
 There are other ways of purifying water, some of which are more effective in certain hazardous situations.
 In some places, it's enough to boil the water for one minute,
 And there are different types of water filters available . If you're concerned about the quality of your water,
 Travellers may encounter an animal pest that is uncommon in their own region.
 Pests can make food go bad, cause infections, or cause a worse allergy, or spread a disease.
 The first known transportation was walking, humans began walking upright two million years ago with the emergence of Homo Erectus.
 And the reason for that is that the military is now based on cailaber,
 And the more you buy, the more you save . So, for example, if you buy a bottle of wine,
 The road between point Marion and Fairmont is known as the most difficult stretch of the Pittsburgh-Buffalo highway.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, be careful of steep grades, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower in the previous and the following sections,
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to Austria,
 Fruit Paste is common, and apples are used in Pasteur all year long,
 And so, in 1767, the first full iron rails were introduced.
 If you want a small but very tasty bread,
 Curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices,
 And the water is either very hard or very soft,
 In the North of India and Pakistan, it's usually used in curry,
 Indonesian food is a very broad term that encompasses all the different regional cuisines of the country's 17,000 Islands.
 But even more importantly, if you use it without restriction,
 And now, a wide variety of simple, seasonal dishes are characteristic, and the main spices that the Javanese prefer are peanuts, chili, and sugar,
 The backrest is a support for the rider's feet,
 This device gives the rider a lot more stability, but it can also cause a fall if the rider's foot gets caught.
 And if the water level rises, it will only be enough to restore eroded sandbars.
 First, most of the horses have a high withers and a narrow, slender hoof.
 And the next, a safety strap, which is a strap that can be pulled back in case the rider falls off.
 Cocham Valley is known as the South American Yosemite Valley,
 The mountain top has a breathtakingly beautiful view from the top of the mountain,
 Including skiing and snowboarding, which is a sport involving skiing or snowboarding down a snow-covered terrain.
 Skiing is a popular sport among ski bums,
 The idea of skiing is a very old one, with cave paintings depicting skiers as far back as 5,000 years ago.
 Skateboarding as a sport dates back to at least the seventeenth century, and the first recreational ski club was founded by Norwegians in Australia.
 Skiing in the back country: This activity is also known as backcountry skiing, ski touring, or skiing.
 The Alps are not included in this, although the Alps are associated with skiing and mountaineering, which are not included in the latter,
 Think of a ski course as a similar hiking course.
 In good conditions, you can go a little bit further than walking, but not as fast as Cross-Country skiing.
 Europe is a continent with many independent countries, and usually, traveling to many of them means going through multiple visa applications and passport interviews.
 But the Schengen zone, on the other hand, functions more like a country.
 Staying in this zone, you don't have to go through the passport check again to cross the border.
 And the same is true for the Schengen visa, which means that once you have a Schengen visa,
 There is no universal definition of antiques, and in some countries, a product that is over 100 years old is considered an antique.
 And in Europe, the age of antiques is much shorter than in North America.
 Handmade products are not as easily defined as mass produced items,
 Reindeer herding is one of the Sami people's important ways of life and is also important to other people in the region.
 Traditionally, all Smi have not been involved in large-scale reindeer herding, but most have lived off of reindeer,
 Today, many Sami people are engaged in modern trade, and tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sapmi.
 Especially among the non-Romany, people, it is widely used, but it is often considered as a derogatory and inaccurate term.
 If the country you're going to visit is on the travel alert list, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 And so, in the end, the government is going to listen to the advice of its own people,
 As an example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 A warning is just a brief summary of a country's political situation.
 The viewpoints that are presented are usually more superficial,
 Weather is the state of the atmosphere at a given place and time,
 Weather is the state of the atmosphere at a given place and time,
 The wind, hail, and snow are all forms of adverse weather,
 Weather-Related phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, and dust storms.
 Travelers should look up the local weather beforehand so that they don't have to make any changes to their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that is considered a combat zone should be trained in the proper use of a weapon.
 The search results for the home page of the local company will probably give you the local company's address.
 The lecture will discuss all of these topics in much more detail,
 The course is usually two to five days long and includes role playing, first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 There are plenty of books and magazines that deal with wildlife survival,
 If you are planning to have a sex change operation overseas,
 Some countries will issue a passport with an X for gender,
 And the willingness to accept these documents from other countries is also very diverse.
 And after the September eleventh attacks,
 Transgender people before surgery,
 Rip currents are a type of rip tide that is formed when a wave breaks on a reef or something similar to a reef.
 And because of this systematic sorting, the deep water is concentrated in a few places, and this is where you have rapid currents all the way down to the bottom.
 And the majority of them die from exhaustion, trying to swim against the current,
 If you just stay in the water, it's not that hard to get back.
 We'll have to see whether he's been found by his own efforts or by someone else.
 Re-Entry shock happens faster, lasts longer, and can be more severe than culture shock.
 And it's not always easy to adapt to a new culture once you're back home.
 And when they return home, they are often still struggling to adapt to their own culture.
 When you first went abroad, you would have been aware that most people would have been patient and understanding.
 And people may not think that patience and understanding are needed for the people who are going home.
 The pyramid sound and light show are among the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the darkness and you can see the pyramids in the silence before the show starts.
 You're always hearing the tourists and the hawkers, and it's like a story book of light and sound.
 The sponge is set up as the background and narrator of the long story.
 Scenes were projected on the pyramids, and fire was projected on the other pyramids.
 South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands, discovered in eighteen hundred and nineteen,
 The largest of these is King George Island, where the town of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 The other is Livingstone and Disappointment Islands, which still have active volcanoes and provide natural harbors.
 Elsworth is located on the Southern tip of the peninsula,
 Here the mountains of the peninsula are again broken up into two ranges,
 The North is also home to the highest mountain in Antarctica, Mount Vinson, which is 4,892 meters high.
 And it may be the only option in remote areas where cell phone coverage is limited.
 Satellite phones are not usually used as a replacement for cell phones,
 The service is used frequently in seaborne transportation, including ocean-going vessels,
 We'll get more information from the local telephone service provider.
 And people are using it more and more for travel and study.
 This is especially popular with graduating students, and it allows you to take a year off from school without it being a huge burden.
 In most cases, enrolling in a gap year course will actually increase your chances of going to high school in your home country.
 And in general, these are free to attend.
 Finland is a good place to go boating in, and it's known as the land of a thousand lakes.
 And in the Bay area, you don't need a boat to get around.
 Although the coastal Islands and large lakes are big enough for any sort of boat,
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with seven to eight people owning a boat per family.
 And in some places, it's free . But in other places, it's quite unusual . In Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand,
 And most of the Baltic cruises are based out of St . Petersburg.
 You can spend a full day here, and then return to the ship for a night's sleep.
 If you go to the coast by sea, you do not need a separate visa for that purpose.
 Some of the cruise ships have Berlin on the itinerary, but Berlin is not close to the sea, and the city is not included in the cruise ship price.
 Flying a plane is a scary experience for everyone, especially for those who have never flown a plane or are afraid of flying.
 This is nothing to be ashamed of, nor is it different from other things that most people have personal fears and aversions to.
 And the idea is that you can overcome that fear of not knowing how the plane works, or not being in control,
 The courier company receives a large fee for delivering the goods quickly, and often, the work order, spare parts, or the spare parts are very time-sensitive.
 And so it's not surprising that the airline uses its own planes for these other routes.
 If you're sending it by air, then it can take a few days to get through customs and off the plane.
 The only way to get it processed more quickly was to ship it as baggage,
 And the first class or business class is the only way to travel if you have the money to pay for it.
 And so it's not cheap . It's roughly about four times the price of a business class, or up to eleven times the price of first class.
 And the first thing I did was to go to the airport and buy a first-class ticket to Beijing.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting there quickly and comfortably.
 The capital is Chiinu, and the main language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic,
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the present policy of the executive towards Moldova and it urges an immediate change of direction.
 Although the political negotiations broke down, the economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Eastern orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city with a population of around three point seven million, and it is the second largest port after Istanbul,
 Once a great ancient city, Smirna is now a modern, developed, and thriving commercial center,
 It has a very Mediterranean feel to it, but it also has a lot of the traditional red roofs,
 Haldarsvik is a small village on the nearby Eysturoy Island,
 There are also some interesting marble carvings of doves on some of the tombs.
 I'd spend thirty minutes walking around this interesting town.
 To the North is the easily accessible, romantic, and enchanting town of Sintra,
 Scotturb bus number 403 runs regularly to Sintra,
 To the North is the world-famous Shrine of Fatima,
 And the cemetery is basically a giant cemetery, and it's a place that's very important to the world's population.
 There are still many people who live here,
 Please show respect, dignity, and honor to the place.
 Do not scratch or deface the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with half of the population preferring Catalan, and the rest understanding and speaking it,
 But most of the signs are only in Catalan, the language that was established as the official language by law.
 But Spanish is still widely used in public transportation and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the Metro are only in Catalan, but during a planned service interruption,
 Parisians are known to be arrogant, rude, and self-centered.
 But the most important thing is to behave like a well-bred person,
 The French are notoriously rude and impolite, but if you show them basic courtesy, they will quickly become polite.
 The National Park of the Plitvice Lakes is covered with a dense forest of fir, beech, and alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 There are a wide range of different climates, different soils, and different elevations.
 And it's also a home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, you'll find the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Squirrel, the Hedgehog, the big Badger,
 During a visit to the monastery, women are required to wear a skirt that covers their knees and to have their shoulders covered.
 Most of the monasteries will provide a cover that you can put on, especially if you bring a brightly colored one,
 Along the same lines, a man is required to wear pants that cover his knees.
 You can borrow it at the entrance, but you have to wash it every time you wear it, so it's not so comfortable to wear this kind of skirt.
 And it's a lot like the foods of the Mediterranean,
 A simple and especially popular evening meal is a sandwich called a Pain-De-Moi,
 And the word Sie, which is used in conjunction with Sie,
 And this is a very important way to distinguish between some verbs and nouns.
 And you'll notice that the verb or adjective is used in the Subject-Verb form.
 And the reason is that most of the words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main characters are C and G, which are pronounced differently depending on the following vowel.
 And you'll also need to distinguish between the r and the rr.
 Persian is relatively easy and has a fairly regular grammar.
 So, let's read this grammar introduction and it will help you to learn more about Persian grammar and to understand the sentences better.
 And of course, if you know romance languages, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But for those who know a little bit of Spanish, the two languages are so similar that they don't need to study them separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories were usually just museums or educational places,
 And at the time, light pollution was not at the same level it is today, so they were located in places that are easily accessible,
 Most of the modern research telescopes are located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is known as the Cherry Blossom viewing event that has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The idea of the plum blossom as a symbol of culture is a Chinese one.
 The first Cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace,
 Plants are the best looking in their natural environment, so the temptation is to say,
 And so, I'm going to go to the garden and collect some samples.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to travel, and it's very easy to get around, and you can buy almost everything you need to buy when you arrive.
 But it's also important to note that the high temperatures are always high,
 And also, the Bible, which traditionally buried the patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob,
 The bus you're trying to take is not going to Kiryat Arba, the Jewish town near Hebron,
 Inland waterways are a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castle of the Loire, the Rhine, or the interesting places along the Danube River,
 They're also planning popular hiking and Cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity,
 A lot of the holidays are universalized to Non-Christians and Non-Christians around the world.
 And it's a tradition to stay up all night and watch the sunrise on Easter morning.
 And of course there is a Christian theological explanation for this,
 A more traditional church holds a vigil on the Saturday night of Easter week,
 All of the animals that first arrived on the island were either swimming, flying, or were in a state of being suspended in the water.
 Mammals, on the other hand, were unable to travel as far from the mainland.
 Since the arrival of people, goats, sheep, cows, pigs, and dogs have all been introduced to the island.
 If you visit the North or South poles in the winter, you will experience the polar night,
 The sky is overcast all day long, so it's a good opportunity to see the Aurora.
 Because the population density is low, and so the light pollution is not a problem,
 Japanese work culture is more about hierarchy and following the rules.
 A suit is the standard business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their last names or titles.
 In the workplace, teamwork is very important, so they emphasize the collective effort over the individual.
 The worker must always receive the approval of his superior,
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.13553791760751452, 'precisions': [0.5336068337641902, 0.25122154689548326, 0.1411540900443881, 0.08463206396530695], 'brevity_penalty': 0.6775387554679289, 'length_ratio': 0.719792888637191, 'translation_length': 17794, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 37.77746363449888, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.761190179573453, 'scores': [0.708961009979248, 0.6221998333930969, 0.870111882686615, 0.5764684081077576, 0.7514415979385376, 0.5136197209358215, 0.857133150100708, 0.6179247498512268, 0.8112372159957886, 0.9357665181159973, 0.9094680547714233, 0.8599437475204468, 0.9339399933815002, 0.7535949945449829, 0.7519076466560364, 0.6745134592056274, 0.6104415059089661, 0.8402332663536072, 0.6822394728660583, 0.4703267514705658, 0.7003604769706726, 0.8945664763450623, 0.33871161937713623, 0.5662698745727539, 0.8356227278709412, 0.9359354376792908, 0.7914345264434814, 0.7026340365409851, 0.7317228317260742, 0.9225545525550842, 0.6451655030250549, 0.7212268710136414, 0.7422275543212891, 0.6478878855705261, 0.9498119354248047, 0.7719137668609619, 0.7806640267372131, 0.8809888958930969, 0.8674435615539551, 0.6625170111656189, 0.8521131277084351, 0.9411768913269043, 0.8824979662895203, 0.6813952326774597, 0.4200444519519806, 0.7154614329338074, 0.8228561282157898, 0.8449069857597351, 0.832517683506012, 0.6607239842414856, 0.8504040837287903, 0.8787405490875244, 0.8360368609428406, 0.9294695258140564, 0.701776921749115, 0.49815633893013, 0.6510959267616272, 0.772488534450531, 0.8737028241157532, 0.9402804374694824, 0.8254309296607971, 0.8932746052742004, 0.6340895891189575, 0.8523373007774353, 0.7431012988090515, 0.8423430919647217, 0.5702895522117615, 0.8313140273094177, 0.5305631160736084, 0.7164063453674316, 0.6205870509147644, 0.6105783581733704, 0.693854808807373, 0.6274803280830383, 0.8053699135780334, 0.5771235823631287, 0.8840709924697876, 0.8116992115974426, 0.9364399313926697, 0.4341758191585541, 0.7302857637405396, 0.8375555276870728, 0.8176977634429932, 0.7366058230400085, 0.5876669883728027, 0.89090895652771, 0.6806803941726685, 0.5822209715843201, 0.8220531344413757, 0.8468900322914124, 0.5868054628372192, 0.9004085659980774, 0.8158023357391357, 0.9108885526657104, 0.7991001605987549, 0.5280007719993591, 0.876929759979248, 0.6411455869674683, 0.7169361710548401, 0.8098393082618713, 0.8876916766166687, 0.5519518256187439, 0.6052361130714417, 0.737749457359314, 0.9054228663444519, 0.7796201109886169, 0.8456965088844299, 0.618819534778595, 0.5816113352775574, 0.656816840171814, 0.7638192176818848, 0.913484513759613, 0.8890838027000427, 0.8983344435691833, 0.7811055779457092, 0.7143043875694275, 0.8296949863433838, 0.7987669706344604, 0.9389058947563171, 0.7862038016319275, 0.6802337169647217, 0.8141607642173767, 0.8304147720336914, 0.9071136116981506, 0.43578335642814636, 0.5280960202217102, 0.8271204829216003, 0.8772311210632324, 0.8810170292854309, 0.8128629922866821, 0.6568026542663574, 0.6827782988548279, 0.5638812780380249, 0.9435610175132751, 0.4376930296421051, 0.8752794861793518, 0.7862451076507568, 0.9033825993537903, 0.9205374717712402, 0.890339195728302, 0.8654725551605225, 0.8507673144340515, 0.9207284450531006, 0.8935326337814331, 0.3467685580253601, 0.6552684903144836, 0.7018298506736755, 0.803756833076477, 0.8758677840232849, 0.9146645665168762, 0.8751729726791382, 0.42911913990974426, 0.8134285807609558, 0.5644721984863281, 0.6309229731559753, 0.8686038255691528, 0.8952640891075134, 0.7185748219490051, 0.7438605427742004, 0.7719109654426575, 0.8390223383903503, 0.49390217661857605, 0.842863142490387, 0.6809932589530945, 0.6498314738273621, 0.7647803425788879, 0.6687601208686829, 0.7537133097648621, 0.5568743348121643, 0.8424385190010071, 0.7936000227928162, 0.9099491238594055, 0.901759147644043, 0.6384781002998352, 0.7506294846534729, 0.759916365146637, 0.6186672449111938, 0.7897517085075378, 0.7929091453552246, 0.81888747215271, 0.8693383932113647, 0.4315648376941681, 0.8433834910392761, 0.7852198481559753, 0.8788788914680481, 0.7046034336090088, 0.7565096020698547, 0.3242241144180298, 0.520422101020813, 0.7407311797142029, 0.8664459586143494, 0.5784907937049866, 0.8166199326515198, 0.7526265382766724, 0.814829409122467, 0.7865020632743835, 0.6636170744895935, 0.6058734059333801, 0.9100471138954163, 0.7242227792739868, 0.47535762190818787, 0.5918881297111511, 0.7815520763397217, 0.7534576058387756, 0.843571126461029, 0.7797699570655823, 0.832756519317627, 0.5401519536972046, 0.7696808576583862, 0.9050043821334839, 0.6024112701416016, 0.9011262655258179, 0.888288140296936, 0.8599459528923035, 0.4661531150341034, 0.8076877593994141, 0.9092147350311279, 0.7795166373252869, 0.8743212819099426, 0.7571502327919006, 0.9429108500480652, 0.38895756006240845, 0.7244992852210999, 0.7661480903625488, 0.6577829718589783, 0.8249525427818298, 0.8238230347633362, 0.7867114543914795, 0.5189008116722107, 0.6796280741691589, 0.5058873295783997, 0.6390280723571777, 0.430753618478775, 0.6235652565956116, 0.3534846007823944, 0.5984202027320862, 0.7003101110458374, 0.912846028804779, 0.8286028504371643, 0.8125541806221008, 0.8082631230354309, 0.42114123702049255, 0.8185243606567383, 0.41532355546951294, 0.860682487487793, 0.9229465126991272, 0.40551963448524475, 0.7588357329368591, 0.3753727376461029, 0.8712416291236877, 0.8373594880104065, 0.8805331587791443, 0.8221042156219482, 0.8970847725868225, 0.910089910030365, 0.8413661122322083, 0.685721218585968, 0.9133622050285339, 0.8634771108627319, 0.7747975587844849, 0.8533914089202881, 0.8073874711990356, 0.6113875508308411, 0.7616432905197144, 0.9358856081962585, 0.8693676590919495, 0.6194354295730591, 0.6728678345680237, 0.9186214208602905, 0.7683394551277161, 0.7091850638389587, 0.8075540661811829, 0.8703365325927734, 0.8247606158256531, 0.44015994668006897, 0.5406676530838013, 0.7583296895027161, 0.3598947823047638, 0.6844319701194763, 0.919741690158844, 0.6225484013557434, 0.8302205204963684, 0.8884633183479309, 0.8504360914230347, 0.9006787538528442, 0.938751757144928, 0.8447681665420532, 0.8158226609230042, 0.8768945932388306, 0.574672520160675, 0.8834513425827026, 0.8054830431938171, 0.7770602107048035, 0.8312116265296936, 0.7240341901779175, 0.7824335694313049, 0.8716818690299988, 0.8774611949920654, 0.7954561710357666, 0.8548430800437927, 0.9145739674568176, 0.8183256983757019, 0.8219223022460938, 0.8607638478279114, 0.4386979639530182, 0.45517420768737793, 0.762424647808075, 0.8405795097351074, 0.9239785075187683, 0.9095185399055481, 0.7458423376083374, 0.9212286472320557, 0.9208800792694092, 0.801359236240387, 0.9117221236228943, 0.8982648253440857, 0.6838950514793396, 0.6857587695121765, 0.8815340995788574, 0.9336423277854919, 0.536910891532898, 0.4026466906070709, 0.7872240543365479, 0.5671085119247437, 0.8406450152397156, 0.7205573320388794, 0.6559819579124451, 0.8289363384246826, 0.7275572419166565, 0.8547558784484863, 0.8344696164131165, 0.8380584120750427, 0.9320536255836487, 0.854360818862915, 0.9186848402023315, 0.931878924369812, 0.7275884747505188, 0.7411354184150696, 0.817215621471405, 0.8672491312026978, 0.6663947701454163, 0.8553339838981628, 0.6428099274635315, 0.6932181715965271, 0.7568588852882385, 0.7567867040634155, 0.8255177140235901, 0.5940122604370117, 0.4561171233654022, 0.7189926505088806, 0.8482369780540466, 0.5423144102096558, 0.7096903324127197, 0.7155471444129944, 0.8864808678627014, 0.647517740726471, 0.8940162658691406, 0.8775604367256165, 0.9161314368247986, 0.7233381271362305, 0.4061857759952545, 0.635800302028656, 0.7908374667167664, 0.8275336623191833, 0.5830129384994507, 0.5994940400123596, 0.8076047301292419, 0.5943986773490906, 0.8021506071090698, 0.7494104504585266, 0.7836203575134277, 0.5792153477668762, 0.42766427993774414, 0.8581036329269409, 0.8891091346740723, 0.8078131079673767, 0.5359758734703064, 0.6672500371932983, 0.8424926996231079, 0.7272974252700806, 0.9011536240577698, 0.3819478452205658, 0.6962668299674988, 0.7388995289802551, 0.8448488116264343, 0.7996391654014587, 0.6924735307693481, 0.7040871977806091, 0.6685978174209595, 0.8487468957901001, 0.9062575697898865, 0.7994275689125061, 0.6706748604774475, 0.8282256126403809, 0.9239708185195923, 0.9037998914718628, 0.8341341614723206, 0.9054940342903137, 0.6421430706977844, 0.899784505367279, 0.6620844602584839, 0.6761364340782166, 0.8755246996879578, 0.5282458662986755, 0.6034671068191528, 0.7927556037902832, 0.9048396944999695, 0.6217342019081116, 0.832744300365448, 0.8833391666412354, 0.4843655526638031, 0.8210133910179138, 0.7967074513435364, 0.7951244711875916, 0.7319875359535217, 0.8481178879737854, 0.8188866972923279, 0.8532814979553223, 0.894487738609314, 0.906431257724762, 0.9196216464042664, 0.8962799310684204, 0.6509683132171631, 0.7678003907203674, 0.592852771282196, 0.7051311135292053, 0.4679493308067322, 0.6985034346580505, 0.8988354802131653, 0.9382710456848145, 0.9259151816368103, 0.8321763873100281, 0.8711113333702087, 0.6099652647972107, 0.6372830271720886, 0.6599157452583313, 0.8491036295890808, 0.6841279864311218, 0.9282546639442444, 0.8027101755142212, 0.8917626738548279, 0.8962166905403137, 0.9314306974411011, 0.7763640880584717, 0.7124143242835999, 0.7809721827507019, 0.835833728313446, 0.568996250629425, 0.501251757144928, 0.6314910054206848, 0.7336503267288208, 0.7341124415397644, 0.9093853235244751, 0.753542959690094, 0.5009868741035461, 0.8629053235054016, 0.6886450052261353, 0.8037724494934082, 0.4960189759731293, 0.8142083883285522, 0.8961131572723389, 0.8349705338478088, 0.5094686150550842, 0.9010424613952637, 0.533338725566864, 0.493369460105896, 0.9081379175186157, 0.661281406879425, 0.5395375490188599, 0.722180187702179, 0.7189224362373352, 0.5217843651771545, 0.6275651454925537, 0.8491554856300354, 0.7475492358207703, 0.6242702603340149, 0.6390593647956848, 0.8062259554862976, 0.8891105055809021, 0.6501991748809814, 0.6066250205039978, 0.6249493956565857, 0.5218049883842468, 0.8778378367424011, 0.92391437292099, 0.8722241520881653, 0.7436712384223938, 0.5867496132850647, 0.8198725581169128, 0.7897125482559204, 0.8035748600959778, 0.8585988283157349, 0.9107462763786316, 0.9240640997886658, 0.8221357464790344, 0.8644282221794128, 0.5234732031822205, 0.5341786742210388, 0.9265161156654358, 0.7429966926574707, 0.5496500730514526, 0.6277834177017212, 0.7766978144645691, 0.7958547472953796, 0.7065894603729248, 0.8626682758331299, 0.8930259346961975, 0.5833848118782043, 0.821539044380188, 0.7462412714958191, 0.6960934996604919, 0.6211373209953308, 0.8239315748214722, 0.7695205211639404, 0.88441002368927, 0.797886312007904, 0.72651606798172, 0.8390615582466125, 0.7294327616691589, 0.5523703098297119, 0.6816746592521667, 0.724032998085022, 0.8181387782096863, 0.8159168362617493, 0.716682493686676, 0.7840773463249207, 0.8333935141563416, 0.7522700428962708, 0.8484141230583191, 0.875195324420929, 0.7687933444976807, 0.48862424492836, 0.81075119972229, 0.7203673124313354, 0.792711079120636, 0.6779699325561523, 0.7403985857963562, 0.7739117741584778, 0.8697652220726013, 0.8422489762306213, 0.7472543120384216, 0.7794551253318787, 0.8595631718635559, 0.8219103813171387, 0.8089517951011658, 0.886344313621521, 0.815456748008728, 0.5129556059837341, 0.6893932819366455, 0.9112111926078796, 0.6748611330986023, 0.8297950625419617, 0.7050114274024963, 0.8714364171028137, 0.8542987704277039, 0.5853535532951355, 0.6218106746673584, 0.8577035069465637, 0.6815120577812195, 0.8055881857872009, 0.8854548335075378, 0.7043871879577637, 0.789385974407196, 0.5370303392410278, 0.63597172498703, 0.7280300259590149, 0.7660592198371887, 0.802123486995697, 0.5822027921676636, 0.7026031613349915, 0.8978028297424316, 0.879577100276947, 0.753273069858551, 0.8048931956291199, 0.9199965596199036, 0.841786801815033, 0.8420777916908264, 0.7813376188278198, 0.8182087540626526, 0.7949104905128479, 0.7463740110397339, 0.8540210127830505, 0.8775144815444946, 0.7754147052764893, 0.5512486696243286, 0.7245744466781616, 0.7322561144828796, 0.8598936200141907, 0.8254441022872925, 0.9028995037078857, 0.8164852261543274, 0.9067676663398743, 0.6768028140068054, 0.527622640132904, 0.8535987734794617, 0.7970191240310669, 0.8351957201957703, 0.7827180027961731, 0.8417133688926697, 0.931593120098114, 0.7675485014915466, 0.5716092586517334, 0.7612937092781067, 0.730750322341919, 0.7851134538650513, 0.9464824795722961, 0.6316896080970764, 0.6708334684371948, 0.8060446381568909, 0.505210280418396, 0.7619226574897766, 0.7120955586433411, 0.8404083847999573, 0.8527367115020752, 0.8253288269042969, 0.7847201824188232, 0.7905466556549072, 0.9582590460777283, 0.9142079949378967, 0.8869795799255371, 0.9475623965263367, 0.8692628145217896, 0.7290821671485901, 0.6626633405685425, 0.5246543288230896, 0.7866937518119812, 0.9314194321632385, 0.9397086501121521, 0.7373574376106262, 0.606231153011322, 0.6966765522956848, 0.6293870806694031, 0.9366140961647034, 0.6899338960647583, 0.9710754156112671, 0.7341014742851257, 0.8065257668495178, 0.601133406162262, 0.8973063230514526, 0.3644629120826721, 0.7868363261222839, 0.9294124245643616, 0.8394888639450073, 0.8414644002914429, 0.8101121187210083, 0.8354353308677673, 0.8467929363250732, 0.795521080493927, 0.8663865327835083, 0.7772426605224609, 0.5988001227378845, 0.8783065676689148, 0.7981361746788025, 0.8170278072357178, 0.7645372748374939, 0.8853954672813416, 0.7756029963493347, 0.8912702202796936, 0.603090226650238, 0.7528972625732422, 0.8092923164367676, 0.9177589416503906, 0.8659056425094604, 0.8234410285949707, 0.9166025519371033, 0.7798689603805542, 0.490980327129364, 0.8279631733894348, 0.7799947261810303, 0.7849026918411255, 0.6580400466918945, 0.8287655711174011, 0.4751708209514618, 0.8462314009666443, 0.8683152794837952, 0.6770972013473511, 0.8949180245399475, 0.8581710457801819, 0.8204200267791748, 0.9319321513175964, 0.8472959399223328, 0.9293920993804932, 0.8636559247970581, 0.8602963089942932, 0.7875304818153381, 0.8961456418037415, 0.5298917889595032, 0.5934333205223083, 0.868571400642395, 0.7909666299819946, 0.8915513753890991, 0.4570169150829315, 0.9111880660057068, 0.7953754663467407, 0.838999330997467, 0.8922263979911804, 0.5214027762413025, 0.8584379553794861, 0.822614848613739, 0.8145927786827087, 0.8477652668952942, 0.9226223826408386, 0.8249068856239319, 0.691856861114502, 0.6080915331840515, 0.604192316532135, 0.6011921167373657, 0.8994021415710449, 0.8944347500801086, 0.891177237033844, 0.9341874718666077, 0.7937039732933044, 0.9252782464027405, 0.5978441834449768, 0.857996940612793, 0.8342949151992798, 0.858837366104126, 0.5408287644386292, 0.8939483761787415, 0.8323251008987427, 0.5348134636878967, 0.7750541567802429, 0.7344090342521667, 0.9135339856147766, 0.8517981171607971, 0.9255316257476807, 0.8225230574607849, 0.8868933320045471, 0.7241897583007812, 0.9186761379241943, 0.8384761810302734, 0.6458936333656311, 0.829764723777771, 0.7551833987236023, 0.8338779807090759, 0.5950029492378235, 0.9171931743621826, 0.612762987613678, 0.882762610912323, 0.8264237642288208, 0.6109773516654968, 0.7900959849357605, 0.7533052563667297, 0.8403103351593018, 0.8024284243583679, 0.6879647374153137, 0.7771990895271301, 0.8168339729309082, 0.8177923560142517, 0.9005381464958191, 0.9233939051628113, 0.871197521686554, 0.8842025399208069, 0.670844316482544, 0.700725257396698, 0.8303500413894653, 0.5997406244277954, 0.7392796874046326, 0.7690303921699524, 0.8183874487876892, 0.6228833794593811, 0.6964179873466492, 0.8022894859313965, 0.9074601531028748, 0.8330287337303162, 0.45628806948661804, 0.8786326050758362, 0.8629921674728394, 0.888070285320282, 0.5878485441207886, 0.8538329005241394, 0.6670849323272705, 0.6380652189254761, 0.8499745726585388, 0.8283600807189941, 0.8789777159690857, 0.7015699744224548, 0.8552457690238953, 0.8164070844650269, 0.8138532042503357, 0.8931877017021179, 0.6828564405441284, 0.8096836805343628, 0.639939546585083, 0.8024799227714539, 0.5656862258911133, 0.8765106797218323, 0.7779427170753479, 0.8824715614318848, 0.615983784198761, 0.8413917422294617, 0.7958626747131348, 0.5835054516792297, 0.8636707663536072, 0.8174534440040588, 0.6212424635887146, 0.9618024230003357, 0.7654831409454346, 0.9016689658164978, 0.7306646108627319, 0.867816686630249, 0.6093534827232361, 0.6535443663597107, 0.8453536033630371, 0.5843695998191833, 0.6295461654663086, 0.6326154470443726, 0.9087636470794678, 0.7950889468193054, 0.8820948004722595, 0.8418479561805725, 0.6964359879493713, 0.7998711466789246, 0.7611396312713623, 0.8015685081481934, 0.6147237420082092, 0.8286024928092957, 0.46780645847320557, 0.7405005097389221, 0.46859094500541687, 0.9011048674583435, 0.8036896586418152, 0.7144913077354431, 0.8813222050666809, 0.8651717305183411, 0.36452043056488037, 0.413715660572052, 0.5297815203666687, 0.8250690698623657, 0.9114064574241638, 0.72001713514328, 0.8401371836662292, 0.8309917449951172, 0.6781025528907776, 0.3887195289134979, 0.5548884272575378, 0.8152889609336853, 0.6402389407157898, 0.6807478666305542, 0.889735758304596, 0.5027284622192383, 0.7802528738975525, 0.7610543370246887, 0.8507506847381592, 0.4546770751476288, 0.6034799218177795, 0.7060853242874146, 0.6227896809577942, 0.5473842620849609, 0.8287695050239563, 0.6358765959739685, 0.9233853220939636, 0.9028686881065369, 0.8681923151016235, 0.5789545178413391, 0.8870787620544434, 0.7674664258956909, 0.8759365081787109, 0.8205438256263733, 0.8863475918769836, 0.6441476345062256, 0.9028253555297852, 0.662752628326416, 0.6868368983268738, 0.8074051737785339, 0.8030413389205933, 0.8614205121994019, 0.7743201851844788, 0.9087151885032654, 0.6846322417259216, 0.9321263432502747, 0.8728997111320496, 0.8070980906486511, 0.5396531820297241, 0.6460041403770447, 0.7259944081306458, 0.8958945870399475, 0.7708939909934998, 0.9051293730735779, 0.7334429621696472, 0.7629213929176331, 0.9193311929702759, 0.8208983540534973, 0.6733967661857605, 0.6583505868911743, 0.7871834635734558, 0.6002119779586792, 0.5092630982398987, 0.7766257524490356, 0.8102930188179016, 0.8366696834564209, 0.7694283723831177, 0.604614794254303, 0.8806825280189514, 0.7477137446403503, 0.777313232421875, 0.7990253567695618, 0.8032586574554443, 0.9332063794136047, 0.8879863023757935, 0.8231407999992371, 0.8118077516555786, 0.7958616018295288, 0.538443386554718, 0.8164101839065552, 0.7916736006736755, 0.7343840599060059, 0.6101518869400024, 0.819827139377594, 0.8795667290687561, 0.7237086892127991, 0.7423010468482971, 0.8045927882194519, 0.6708992123603821, 0.8889216780662537, 0.8972957134246826, 0.657109260559082, 0.7784832715988159, 0.7302005887031555, 0.7795845866203308, 0.9122329354286194, 0.6229689717292786, 0.7922174334526062, 0.8475094437599182, 0.8461315631866455, 0.8248066306114197, 0.8309755921363831, 0.895950973033905, 0.7926610112190247, 0.7459918856620789, 0.7232232093811035, 0.8716150522232056, 0.7674594521522522, 0.7463358044624329, 0.7977268099784851, 0.5843378901481628, 0.9039982557296753, 0.9263773560523987, 0.7289448380470276, 0.5482603907585144, 0.8175886869430542, 0.9311802387237549, 0.8685733079910278, 0.811145544052124, 0.5783088207244873, 0.7279561161994934, 0.8564002513885498, 0.8229222893714905, 0.7101142406463623, 0.7752017378807068, 0.7214137315750122, 0.6781535148620605, 0.47362276911735535, 0.7520634531974792, 0.8003234267234802, 0.9019900560379028, 0.8990002274513245, 0.9429611563682556, 0.6740707159042358, 0.9384058117866516, 0.548004150390625, 0.809100329875946, 0.8791620135307312, 0.8169419169425964, 0.9139960408210754, 0.7159910798072815, 0.9146090745925903, 0.7341191172599792, 0.906290590763092, 0.740356981754303, 0.5726625323295593, 0.5845263600349426, 0.4836326241493225, 0.8976712226867676, 0.6692701578140259, 0.7852635383605957, 0.8167791366577148, 0.6043815016746521, 0.9468372464179993, 0.8420823216438293, 0.8721153736114502, 0.8297579884529114, 0.8242552280426025, 0.8250419497489929, 0.9228792786598206, 0.9124678373336792, 0.830435574054718, 0.6835193037986755, 0.6495201587677002, 0.5171733498573303, 0.9033714532852173, 0.6199527382850647, 0.6467834711074829, 0.8311936855316162, 0.89777010679245, 0.8036091923713684, 0.8642348647117615, 0.8921586871147156, 0.7316086888313293, 0.8243244290351868, 0.710795521736145, 0.7204404473304749, 0.8139650225639343, 0.6760505437850952, 0.8533716201782227, 0.7786999940872192, 0.8285614252090454, 0.8079709410667419, 0.8141210079193115, 0.8939643502235413, 0.8628872036933899, 0.7234283089637756]}